Hawaii, session 2025, HB617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a growing nursing workforce shortage, with the current demand for nurses exceeding supply by approximately one thousand positions.  Experts have recommended expanding the capacity of university nursing programs to help reduce nursing workforce shortages. The legislature further finds that the county of Maui is the largest county in the State without a college or university bachelor of science in nursing degree program.  The university of Hawaii Maui college's nursing program offers two degrees:  a certificate of achievement and an associate in science nursing.  Students who earn an associate in science nursing must then transfer to the bachelor of science in nursing pathway at the university of Hawaii at Manoa to further their education. The legislature believes that offering a bachelor of science in nursing program at the university of Hawaii Maui college can help to increase the supply of nurse graduates, reduce the nursing workforce shortage, and allow Maui nursing students to remain on Maui during their entire course of study. The legislature declares that the establishment of a bachelor of science in nursing program in the county of Maui is a matter of statewide concern. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys for the establishment of a bachelor of science in nursing degree program at the university of Hawaii Maui college. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the sum of $60,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to meet the increased demand for prerequisite courses by students newly enrolled in the bachelor of science in nursing degree program at the university of Hawaii Maui college. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $90,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the sum of $60,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for additional personnel associated with establishment of the bachelor of science in nursing degree program at the university of Hawaii Maui college. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $60,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for supplies, equipment, and simulation and laboratory upgrades associated with establishment of the bachelor of science in nursing degree program at the university of Hawaii Maui college. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for instructional costs associated with providing a third year of nursing courses following the establishment of the bachelor of science in nursing degree program at the university of Hawaii Maui college. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________